District of Columbia statutes.
19-1304.13

Cy pres.

Except as otherwise provided in the terms of the trust, if a particular charitable purpose is or becomes unlawful, impracticable, impossible to achieve, or wasteful:

(1)

The trust does not fail, in whole or in part;

(2)

The trust property does not revert to the settlor or the settlor’s successors in interest; and

(3)

The court may apply cy pres to modify or terminate the trust by directing that the trust property be applied or distributed, in whole or in part, in a manner consistent with the settlor’s charitable purposes.

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 413 of the Uniform Trust Code.
This section is referenced in § 19-1304.10.